data/lexd/70-numerals.lexd
LEXICON Numerals
aīns<Num><Msc><Sg><Nom>:aīns
aīns<Num><Fem><Sg><Nom>:aina
aīns<Num><Neut><Sg><Nom>:ainan
dwāi<Num><Msc><Pl><Nom>:dwāi
dwāi<Num><Fem><Pl><Nom>:dwai
dwāi<Num><Neut><Pl><Nom>:dwai
tīrts<Num><Ord><Msc><Sg><Nom>:tīrts
tīrts<Num><Ord><Fem><Sg><Nom>:tīrta
tīrts<Num><Ord><Neut><Sg><Nom>:tīrtan
kettwīrts<Num><Ord><Msc><Sg><Nom>:kettwīrts
